Hawaii statutes.
§501-218 Schedule of fees; authority to
amend. (a) The fees payable under this chapter are as follows:

(1) For every application filed pursuant to this
chapter, including indexing and recording the application, and transmitting to
registrar, when filed with assistant registrar, $3;

(2) For every plan filed, $1;

(3) For examining title, $10 and two-tenths of one
per cent of the assessed value of the land and improvements on the basis of the
last assessment for taxation, or the value of the land as determined under
section 501-211 when the land was not separately assessed;

(4) For verifying and checking map on the ground, for
lots of one acre or less, $25; an addition of $1 an acre or fraction thereof
for all area over one acre and up to one hundred acres; an addition of 50 cents
an acre or fraction thereof for all area over one hundred acres and up to one
thousand acres; an addition of 25 cents an acre or fraction thereof for all
area over one thousand acres;

(5) For checking survey and map as to form and
mathematical correctness, but not on the ground, $3 an hour;

(6) For approving subdivision of registered land, and
for checking the form and mathematical correctness, but not on the ground, $3
an hour;

(7) For all services by a sheriff or other police
officer under this chapter, the same fees as are now provided by law for each
service;

(8) For each instrument affecting a title not
reported in applicant's filed abstract of title, $2;

(9) For filing an amended application, $1;

(10) For each notice by publication, 25 cents;

(11) For entering any general default, $1;

(12) For filing any answer, $1, to be paid by the
party filing the answer;

(13) For every subpoena, $1;

(14) For swearing each witness, 10 cents;

(15) For entering any discontinuance, $1;

(16) For filing notice of appeal, $30;

(17) For entry of order dismissing application, or
decree of registration, and sending memorandum to assistant registrar, $1;

(18) For copy of decree of registration, $1;

(19) For filing any petition after original
registration, $1; an addition of 25 cents for each exhibit attached;

(20) For filing any order after original registration,
$5;

(21) In all cases not expressly provided for by law,
the fees of all public officers for any official duty or service under this
chapter shall be at a rate established by the court; and

(22) For any application made by or in the name of the
State, or any political subdivision of the State, any proceedings upon the
application or any dealing with registered land by the State, or any political
subdivision of the State, as owner, no fees shall be charged.

(b) For recordation of the document of which
the United States, State of Hawaii, or any county of the State of Hawaii, is
the grantee, no fees shall be charged.

(c) The supreme court, by rule of court, from
time to time, may revise, amend, add to, or eliminate any fees payable under
subsection (a), or prescribe additional fees as it deems reasonable, for
services provided by the office of the registrar of the land court as may be
required under this chapter.

(d) The department of land and natural
resources, by rule adopted pursuant to chapter 91, from time to time, may
revise, amend, add to, or eliminate any fees payable under subsection (a) for
services provided by assistant registrars in the bureau of conveyances under
this chapter.

(e) The department of accounting and general
services, by rule adopted pursuant to chapter 91, from time to time, may
revise, amend, add to, or eliminate any fees payable under subsection (a) for
services provided by the state land surveyor for checking and processing land
court maps and other services as may be required under this chapter. [L 1903, c
56, §110; am L 1907, c 43, §5; am L 1915, c 61, §1; am L 1921, c 156, §§1, 2;
RL 1925, §3300; am L 1927, c 258, §11; am L 1929, c 75, §1; am L 1933, c 21,
§1; RL 1935, §5105; RL 1945, §12705; am L 1945, c 241, §2 and c 255, §3; am L
1949, c 394, §2; RL 1955, §342-105; am L 1957, c 316, §24; HRS §501-218; am L
1972, c 91, §1(rr), (ss); am L 1980, c 154, §1; am L 1985, c 147, §2; am L
1986, c 246, §25; am L 1988, c 346, §24; am L 1989, c 51, §3 and c 211, §10; am
L 1990, c 281, §11; am L 1992, c 197, §5; am L 1993, c 141, §2; am L 2014, c
92, §2]

Cross References

Modification of fees, see §92-28.

Rules of Court

Fees, see RLC rules 70, 107; deposit of fees, see RLC rule 4.

Case Notes

Paragraph (9) relating to instruments affecting title and not
reported, construed. 32 H. 813.

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next